Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 17. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.50.900.
Regulations.

In addition to the regulations the department is required to adopt under this chapter, the department may adopt other regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.50.910.
Interstate application.

A limited liability company that is organized and existing under this chapter may conduct its affairs and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in another jurisdiction, subject to the laws of that jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“articles of organization” means the articles of organization filed under AS

10.50.070

and the articles as amended or restated;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“consolidation” means a consolidation authorized by AS

10.50.500

;

“corporation” means a corporation organized under the laws of this or another state, or of this or another country;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“filed,” unless expressly provided otherwise, means filed with the department;

“foreign limited liability company” means an organization that is

not incorporated;

organized under the law of a state other than this state, or under the law of a foreign country;

organized under a statute that affords to each of its members limited liability regarding the liabilities of the organization; and

not required to be registered under a statute of this state other than this chapter;

“interim distribution” means a distribution of the assets of a limited liability company to the company’s members, except as provided under AS

10.50.425

;

“know” means to have actual knowledge or to know other facts that demonstrate bad faith in the circumstances; this definition applies also to the derivatives of “know,” including “known,” “unknown,” and “knowledge”;

“limited liability company” or “domestic limited liability company” means an organization organized under this chapter;

“limited liability company interest” means an interest in a limited liability company issued under AS

10.50.275

;

“limited partnership” means a limited partnership organized under AS 32.11 or under the law of another state or a foreign country;

“manager” means a person who manages a limited liability company, if the articles of organization provide that the company is managed by a manager;

“managing member” means a member of a limited liability company if the company’s articles of organization do not provide that the company is managed by a manager;

“member” means a person who has been admitted to membership in a limited liability company under AS

10.50.155

—

10.50.160

and whose membership has not ended under AS

10.50.180

—

10.50.185

or

10.50.205

—

10.50.225

;

“merger” means a merger authorized by AS

10.50.500

;

“operating agreement” means a written agreement among all of the members of a limited liability company about conducting the affairs of the company;

“professional service” has the meaning given in AS

10.45.500

;

“property” includes cash;

“state” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, and includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, the Virgin Islands, American Samoa, and the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am §§ 11 — 13 ch 78 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 52 SLA 2007; am §§ 8, 9 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

The paragraphs in this section were reorganized in 2007 and 2013 to maintain alphabetical order.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, the 2013 changes to this section do not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.

Distributions.

Because the superior court did not inquire into the origins of settlement payments and merely imputed them to a limited liability company (LLC), apparently as a matter of law without regard to the funds’ actual source, the supreme court could not review the legal conclusion that the funds were LLC distributions; absent evidence tracing the funds to the LLC, they were not LLC distributions. Duffus v. Baker, — P.3d — (Alaska July 15, 2022).

Sec. 10.50.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Revised Limited Liability Company Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 14 ch 78 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 1999)